Hawaii statutes.
[§200-15] Vessels or property taken into
legal custody; unauthorized control. No person shall exercise control over
a vessel or other property that is under legal custody, seizure, or detention
by the department. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next